District of Columbia statutes.
47-414

Repealed

Abatement of taxes.

Repealed.

Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 858, Pub. L. 80-610, title IX, § 901
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(d), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-414.
1973 Ed., § 47-314.
Section 410(e) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(b), (d), (f), (l), (n), (o), (r), (v), (x)through (aa), (cc), (ff), (gg), (ll), (pp), (vv), (ww), (aaa), (ccc), (eee), and (ggg) shall apply as of January 1, 2001.”